North Dakota statutes. TITLE 13 Debtor And Creditor Relationship
CHAPTER 13-09 Money Transmitters
13-09-20.
Consent orders.

The commissioner may enter into a consent order at any time with a person to resolve a matter arising under this chapter. A consent order must be signed by the person to whom it is issued or by the person’s authorized representative, and must indicate agreement with the terms contained in the order. A consent order may provide that it does not constitute an admission by a person that this chapter or a rule adopted or an order issued under this chapter has been violated.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 128, § 2.

13-09-21.
Civil penalties.

The commissioner may impose a civil money penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars per violation upon a person or agency who willfully violates a law, rule, written agreement, or order under this chapter. An interested party may appeal the assessment of a civil money penalty by filing a written notice of appeal within twenty days after service of the assessment of civil money penalties. A civil money penalty collected under this section must be paid to the state treasurer and deposited in the financial institutions regulatory fund.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 128, § 2; 2009, ch. 140, § 4.

13-09-22.
Criminal penalties.

A person who intentionally makes a false statement, misrepresentation, or false certification in a record filed or required to be maintained under this chapter, or that intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry in such a record, is guilty of a class C felony.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or order of the department of financial institutions made pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or who engages in any act, practice, or transaction declared by any provision of this chapter to be unlawful is guilty of a class C felony.

An individual who knowingly engages in any activity for which a license is required under this chapter without being licensed under this chapter is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 128, § 2.

13-09-23.
Administrative procedures.

All administrative proceedings under this chapter must be conducted in accordance with chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 128, § 2.

13-09-24.
Savings and transitional provisions.

A license issued under the provisions of chapter 51-17 that is in effect immediately before July 1, 2005, remains in force as a license under this chapter until the license’s expiration date. Thereafter, the licensee must be treated as if the licensee had applied for and had received a license under this chapter and is required to comply with the renewal requirements set forth in this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 128, § 2.

13-09-25.
Prohibited acts and practices.

It is a violation of this chapter for a person or individual subject to this chapter to knowingly:

Subscribe to, or make or cause to be made, any material false statement or representation in any application or other document or statement required to be filed under any provision of this chapter, or to omit to state any material statement or fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in light of the circumstances under which the statements are made, not misleading.

Directly or indirectly, employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud or mislead any person.

Directly or indirectly, make any untrue statement of a material fact or to omit to state a material fact.

Engage in any unfair or deceptive practice toward any person.

Conduct or solicit any business covered by this chapter without holding a valid license as required under this chapter or assist or aid and abet any person in the conduct of business under this chapter without a valid license as required under this chapter.

Fail to make disclosures as required by this chapter and any other applicable state or federal law and regulations.

Fail to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter or fail to comply with any other state or federal law, including the rules and regulations thereunder, applicable to any business authorized or conducted under this chapter.

Make, in any manner, any false or deceptive statement or representation.

Negligently make any false statement or knowingly and willfully make any omission of material fact in connection with any information or reports filed with a governmental agency or in connection with any investigation conducted by the commissioner or another governmental agency.

Collect, charge, attempt to collect or charge, or use or propose any agreement purporting to collect or charge any fee prohibited by this chapter.

Fail to truthfully account for moneys belonging to or collected from another.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 107, § 11.

13-09-26.
Confidentiality.

To promote more effective regulation and reduce regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing, the commissioner or commissioner’s designee may furnish information to or receive information from a nationwide multistate licensing system for the purpose of regulation of the financial services industry. Information furnished by the commissioner to any third party which is confidential or privileged in the commissioner’s possession remains confidential or privileged in the possession of the third party. Information received by the commissioner from any third party which is confidential or privileged in the third-party’s possession remains confidential or privileged in the commissioner’s possession.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 115, § 15.